Utah statutes.
72-4-301.5.   Designation of highways as a National Scenic Byway or All-
American Road.
Except as provided in Section 72-4-304, a highway or state scenic byway may
not be nominated for designation as a National Scenic Byway or All-American
Road unless the nomination is approved by the Legislature.
